Hawaii, session 2026, HB1454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that transportation costs are a major contributing factor to the high cost of living in the State.  The legislature further finds that private employers are not currently required to reimburse employees for mileage expenses when using their personal vehicle to carry out work-related duties.  California, Illinois, and Massachusetts have implemented laws to ensure that employees are fairly compensated for such usage.  The legislature additionally finds that when employers require employees to carry out certain responsibilities that involve driving their personal vehicle, the employer should bear the costs associated with such usage. The purpose of this Act is to require employers to reimburse employees for vehicle mileage expenses incurred when using their personal vehicle to carry out employee duties or at the direction of the employer. SECTION 2.  Chapter 388, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§388-     Vehicle mileage; reimbursement.  (a)  An employer shall reimburse an employee for vehicle mileage expenses incurred when using their personal vehicle to carry out employee duties or at the direction of the employer; provided that employers shall not be required to reimburse employees for any personal commuting expenses, including travel between an employee's home and workplace. (b) Employees shall be reimbursed at a rate equal to the standard mileage rates established by the Internal Revenue Service." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________